Tennessee, session 114, HB1093.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-1353(b), is amended by
deleting "ten (10) days" and substituting "fifteen (15) days".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1093
003095
- 1 -